Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-128] Cruelty and maltreatment.
Any person subject to this chapter who is guilty of cruelty toward, or
oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to the person's orders shall
be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next